Wisconsin, session 2025, AB118.
do enact as follows:AB118,13Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 4insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB118,27Section 2. 20.115 (4) (t) of the statutes is created to read:AB118,2,10820.115 (4) (t) Transition to grazing pilot program. From the environmental 9fund, the amounts in the schedule for the transition to grazing pilot program under 10s. 93.60.AB118,311Section 3. 93.60 of the statutes is created to read:AB118,2,131293.60 Transition to grazing pilot program. (1) Definitions. In this 13section:AB118,2,1814(a) “Managed grazing” means a grazing system alternative to continuous 15grazing, in which pastured fields are subdivided into smaller paddocks, livestock 16density is controlled, and animals are rotated through paddocks at a frequency that 17maintains perennial forage-based vegetative cover, ensures regular access to fresh 18higher quality forage, and reduces soil compaction and erosion.AB118,2,2219(b) “Marginal area” means land that is excluded from cultivation due to 20economic infeasibility or physical restriction for growing conventional crops, and 21includes riparian areas, low areas prone to flooding, and steep lands not conducive 22to conventional cultivation.AB118,3,323(2) Transition to grazing pilot program. From the appropriation under s. 120.115 (4) (t), the department shall create and administer a transition to grazing 2pilot program that awards grants to farmers for managed grazing technical 3assistance and implementation support.AB118,3,54(3) Grazing grants. (a) Subject to par. (b), the transition to grazing pilot 5program shall award grants to farmers for any of the following purposes:AB118,3,761. Assist a farmer with establishing perennial forages for rotational grazing of 7livestock raised in a forage-based managed grazing system.AB118,3,1082. Provide assistance to a farmer in establishing harvestable continuous cover 9in marginal areas that can produce supplemental feed for livestock that is raised in 10a forage-based managed grazing system.AB118,3,12113. Provide a farmer with incentive payments during the first 3 years of the 12farmer’s transition to forage-based managed grazing systems.AB118,3,15134. Assist a farmer with paying for forage-based managed grazing system 14infrastructure needs, including fencing, watering, and other livestock management 15infrastructure.AB118,3,18165. Technical assistance and support from a certified grazing specialist in 17developing grazing plans, including determining field layout, infrastructure setup, 18seed selection, and establishment of rotational grazing patterns.AB118,3,2319(b) Grants awarded under par. (a) shall only be awarded to a farmer 20implementing a new forage-based managed grazing system or a new managed 21grazing practice that improves the conservation and financial performance of 22existing grazing systems; grants may not be awarded to a farmer for the support of 23the farmer’s existing grazing practices.AB118,4,21(c) The department may not award more than $40,000 in grants under par. (a) 2to any one grantee.AB118,4,73(d) In the year following the department’s decision to grant an award under 4par. (a) the department may provide up to 75 percent of the award to the grantee, 5and in each of the 2nd and 3rd years following the department’s decision to grant an 6award under par. (a), the department may provide up to 12.5 percent of the award to 7the grantee.AB118,4,98(4) Support for farmers. (a) The transition to grazing pilot program shall 9provide the following for farmers and persons in agribusiness:AB118,4,12101. Assistance in navigating and analyzing the economics of forage-based 11managed grazing and providing forage-fed livestock research, market development 12initiatives, and other market opportunities.AB118,4,14132. Best practices for meeting consumer demand for forage-fed livestock 14products.AB118,4,17153. Assistance in fostering innovation in and expanding farm and agribusiness 16strategies in forage-based managed grazing systems and forage-fed livestock 17practices.AB118,4,1918(b) The department shall support the state’s forage-fed livestock supply chain, 19including regional processors, aggregators, distributors, and markets.AB118,420Section 4. Nonstatutory provisions.AB118,5,221(1) The authorized FTE positions for the department of agriculture, trade and 22consumer protection are increased by 0.5 SEG position, to be funded from the 1appropriation under s. 20.115 (4) (t), for a position supporting the performance of 2the transition to grazing pilot program functions required under s. 93.60 (4).AB118,53Section 5. Effective date.AB118,5,54(1) This act takes effect on the day after publication, or on the 2nd day after 5publication of the 2025 biennial budget act, whichever is later.AB118,5,66